Tennessee, session 114, HB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
HB1492
009512
- 1 -

SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
October 1 of every year is observed as "APDS Day," to raise awareness for
activated PI3K delta syndrome, and to bring attention to Tennesseans who are suffering
from this disease.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009512